test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-2tav-o_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - hillo:
    hillo+N+Sg+Nom:  hillo
    hillo+N+Sg+Gen:  hilo
    hillo+N+Sg+Acc:  hilo
    hillo+N+Sg+Ill:  hiilon
    hillo+N+Sg+Loc:  hilloost
    hillo+N+Sg+Com:  hilloin
    hillo+N+Sg+Abe:  hilottáá
    hillo+N+Ess:  hillon
    hillo+N+Par:  hillod
    hillo+N+Pl+Nom:  hiloh
    hillo+N+Pl+Gen:  hiloi
    hillo+N+Pl+Acc:  hilloid
    hillo+N+Pl+Ill:  hilloid
    hillo+N+Pl+Loc:  hiloin
    hillo+N+Pl+Com:  hiloiguin
    hillo+N+Pl+Abe:  hiloittáá

  Noun - millo: # o-stems
    millo+N+Sg+Nom: millo
    millo+N+Sg+Gen: milo
    millo+N+Sg+Acc: milo
    millo+N+Sg+Ill: miilon
    millo+N+Sg+Loc: milloost
    millo+N+Sg+Com: milloin
    millo+N+Pl+Abe: milottáá
    millo+N+Ess:    millon
    millo+N+Par:    millod
    millo+N+Pl+Nom: miloh
    millo+N+Pl+Gen: miloi
    millo+N+Pl+Acc: milloid
    millo+N+Pl+Ill: milloid
    millo+N+Pl+Loc: milloin
    millo+N+Pl+Com: miloiguin
    millo+N+Pl+Abe: miloittáá

  Noun - himo:
    himo+N+Sg+Nom:  himo
    himo+N+Sg+Gen:  himo
    himo+N+Sg+Acc:  himo
    himo+N+Sg+Ill:  himon
    himo+N+Sg+Loc:  hiimoost
    himo+N+Sg+Com: [hiimooin, himoin]
    himo+N+Sg+Abe:  himottáá
    himo+N+Ess:  himmoon
    himo+N+Par:  himmood
    himo+N+Pl+Nom:  himoh
    himo+N+Pl+Gen:  himoi
    himo+N+Pl+Acc:  himoid
    himo+N+Pl+Ill:  himoid
    himo+N+Pl+Loc:  himoin
    himo+N+Pl+Com:  himoiguin
    himo+N+Pl+Abe:  himoittáá

  Noun - pino:
    pino+N+Sg+Nom:  pino
    pino+N+Sg+Gen:  pino
    pino+N+Sg+Acc:  pino
    pino+N+Sg+Ill:  pinon
    pino+N+Sg+Loc:  piinoost
    pino+N+Sg+Com:  pinoin
    pino+N+Sg+Abe:  pinottáá
    pino+N+Ess:  pinnoon
    pino+N+Par:  pinnood
    pino+N+Pl+Nom:  pinoh
    pino+N+Pl+Gen:  pinoi
    pino+N+Pl+Acc:  pinoid
    pino+N+Pl+Ill:  pinoid
    pino+N+Pl+Loc:  pinoin
    pino+N+Pl+Com:  pinoiguin
    pino+N+Pl+Abe:  pinoittáá

  Noun - sino:
    sino+N+Sg+Nom:  sino
    sino+N+Sg+Gen:  sino
    sino+N+Sg+Acc:  sino
    sino+N+Sg+Ill:  sinon
    sino+N+Sg+Loc:  siinoost
    sino+N+Sg+Com:  sinoin
    sino+N+Sg+Abe:  sinottáá
    sino+N+Ess:  sinnoon
    sino+N+Pl+Nom:  sinoh
    sino+N+Pl+Gen:  sinoi
    sino+N+Pl+Acc:  sinoid
    sino+N+Pl+Ill:  sinoid
    sino+N+Pl+Loc:  sinoin
    sino+N+Pl+Com:  sinoiguin
    sino+N+Pl+Abe:  sinoittáá

  Noun - tinno:
    tinno+N+Sg+Nom:  tinno
    tinno+N+Sg+Gen:  tino
    tinno+N+Sg+Acc:  tino
    tinno+N+Sg+Ill:  tiinon
    tinno+N+Sg+Loc:  tinnoost
    tinno+N+Sg+Com:  tinnoin
    tinno+N+Sg+Abe:  tinottáá
    tinno+N+Ess:  tinnoon
    tinno+N+Par:  tinnood
    tinno+N+Pl+Nom:  tinoh
    tinno+N+Pl+Gen:  tinoi
    tinno+N+Pl+Acc:  tinoid
    tinno+N+Pl+Ill:  tinnoid
    tinno+N+Pl+Loc:  tinoin
    tinno+N+Pl+Com:  tinoiguin
    tinno+N+Pl+Abe:  tinoittáá

  Noun - kirno:
    kirno+N+Sg+Nom:  kirno
    kirno+N+Sg+Gen:  kirno
    kirno+N+Sg+Acc:  kirno
    kirno+N+Sg+Ill:  kiirnon
    kirno+N+Sg+Loc:  kirnoost
    kirno+N+Sg+Com:  kirnoin
    kirno+N+Sg+Abe:  kirnottáá
    kirno+N+Ess:     kirnon
    kirno+N+Par:     kirnod
    kirno+N+Pl+Nom:  kirnoh
    kirno+N+Pl+Gen:  kirnoi
    kirno+N+Pl+Acc:  kirnoid
    kirno+N+Pl+Ill:  kirnoid
    kirno+N+Pl+Loc:  kirnoin
    kirno+N+Pl+Com:  kirnoiguin
    kirno+N+Pl+Abe:  kirnoittáá

  Noun - lippo:
    lippo+N+Sg+Nom:  lippo
    lippo+N+Sg+Gen:  lipo
    lippo+N+Sg+Acc:  lipo
    lippo+N+Sg+Ill:  liipon
    lippo+N+Sg+Loc:  lippoost
    lippo+N+Sg+Com:  lippoin
    lippo+N+Sg+Abe:  lipottáá
    lippo+N+Ess:  lippon
    lippo+N+Par:  lippod
    lippo+N+Pl+Nom:  lipoh
    lippo+N+Pl+Gen:  lipoi
    lippo+N+Pl+Acc:  lippoid
    lippo+N+Pl+Ill:  lippoid
    lippo+N+Pl+Loc:  lipoin
    lippo+N+Pl+Com:  lipoiguin
    lippo+N+Pl+Abe:  lipoittáá

  Noun - rippo:
    rippo+N+Sg+Nom:  rippo
    rippo+N+Sg+Gen:  ripo
    rippo+N+Sg+Acc:  ripo
    rippo+N+Sg+Ill:  riipon
    rippo+N+Sg+Loc:  rippoost
    rippo+N+Sg+Com:  rippoin
    rippo+N+Sg+Abe:  ripottáá
    rippo+N+Ess:  rippon
    rippo+N+Par:  rippod
    rippo+N+Pl+Nom:  ripoh
    rippo+N+Pl+Gen:  ripoi
    rippo+N+Pl+Acc:  rippoid
    rippo+N+Pl+Ill:  rippoid
    rippo+N+Pl+Loc:  ripoin
    rippo+N+Pl+Com:  ripoiguin
    rippo+N+Pl+Abe:  ripoittáá

  Noun - nitro:
    nitro+N+Sg+Nom:  nitro
    nitro+N+Sg+Gen:  nitro
    nitro+N+Sg+Acc:  nitro
    nitro+N+Sg+Ill:  niitron
    nitro+N+Sg+Loc:  nitroost
    nitro+N+Sg+Com:  nitroin
    nitro+N+Sg+Abe:  nitrottáá
    nitro+N+Ess:  nitron
    nitro+N+Par:  nitrod
    nitro+N+Pl+Nom:  nitroh
    nitro+N+Pl+Gen:  nitroi
    nitro+N+Pl+Acc:  nitroid
    nitro+N+Pl+Ill:  nitroid
    nitro+N+Pl+Loc:  nitroin
    nitro+N+Pl+Com:  nitroiguin
    nitro+N+Pl+Abe:  nitroittáá

  Noun - pisso:
    pisso+N+Sg+Nom:  pisso
    pisso+N+Sg+Gen:  piso
    pisso+N+Sg+Acc:  piso
    pisso+N+Sg+Ill:  piison
    pisso+N+Sg+Loc:  pissoost
    pisso+N+Sg+Com:  pissoin
    pisso+N+Sg+Abe:  pisottáá
    pisso+N+Ess:  pisson
    pisso+N+Par:  pissod
    pisso+N+Pl+Nom:  pisoh
    pisso+N+Pl+Gen:  pisoi
    pisso+N+Pl+Acc: [pisoid, pissoid]
    pisso+N+Pl+Ill:  pissoid
    pisso+N+Pl+Loc:  pisoin
    pisso+N+Pl+Com:  pisoiguin
    pisso+N+Pl+Abe:  pisoittáá

  Noun - ito:
    ito+N+Sg+Nom:  ito
    ito+N+Sg+Gen:  iđo
    ito+N+Sg+Acc:  iđo
    ito+N+Sg+Ill:  iton
    ito+N+Sg+Loc:  iiđoost
    ito+N+Sg+Com:  iiđooin
    ito+N+Sg+Abe:  iđottáá
    ito+N+Ess:  ittoon
    ito+N+Par:  ittood
    ito+N+Pl+Nom:  iđoh
    ito+N+Pl+Gen:  iđoi
    ito+N+Pl+Acc:  iđoid
    ito+N+Pl+Ill:  iiđooid
    ito+N+Pl+Loc:  iđoin
    ito+N+Pl+Com:  iđoiguin
    ito+N+Pl+Abe:  iđoittáá

  Noun - kisto:
    kisto+N+Sg+Nom:  kisto
    kisto+N+Sg+Gen:  kisto
    kisto+N+Sg+Acc:  kisto
    kisto+N+Sg+Ill:  kiiston
    kisto+N+Sg+Loc:  kistoost
    kisto+N+Sg+Com:  kistoin
    kisto+N+Sg+Abe:  kistottáá
    kisto+N+Ess:  kiston
    kisto+N+Par:  kistod
    kisto+N+Pl+Nom:  kistoh
    kisto+N+Pl+Gen:  kistoi
    kisto+N+Pl+Acc:  kistoid
    kisto+N+Pl+Ill:  kistoid
    kisto+N+Pl+Loc:  kistoin
    kisto+N+Pl+Com:  kistoiguin
    kisto+N+Pl+Abe:  kistoittáá

  Noun - listo:
    listo+N+Sg+Nom:  listo
    listo+N+Sg+Gen:  listo
    listo+N+Sg+Acc:  listo
    listo+N+Sg+Ill:  liiston
    listo+N+Sg+Loc:  listoost
    listo+N+Sg+Com:  listoin
    listo+N+Sg+Abe:  listottáá
    listo+N+Ess:  liston
    listo+N+Par:  listod
    listo+N+Pl+Nom:  listoh
    listo+N+Pl+Gen:  listoi
    listo+N+Pl+Acc:  listoid
    listo+N+Pl+Ill:  listoid
    listo+N+Pl+Loc:  listoin
    listo+N+Pl+Com:  listoiguin
    listo+N+Pl+Abe:  listoittáá

  Noun - litto:
    litto+N+Sg+Nom:  litto
    litto+N+Sg+Gen:  lito
    litto+N+Sg+Acc:  lito
    litto+N+Sg+Ill:  liiton
    litto+N+Sg+Loc:  littoost
    litto+N+Sg+Com:  littoin
    litto+N+Sg+Abe:  litottáá
    litto+N+Ess:  litton
    litto+N+Par:  littod
    litto+N+Pl+Nom:  litoh
    litto+N+Pl+Gen:  litoi
    litto+N+Pl+Acc:  littoid
    litto+N+Pl+Ill:  littoid
    litto+N+Pl+Loc:  litoin
    litto+N+Pl+Com:  litoiguin
    litto+N+Pl+Abe:  litoittáá

  Noun - mitto:
    mitto+N+Sg+Nom:  mitto
    mitto+N+Sg+Gen:  mito
    mitto+N+Sg+Acc:  mito
    mitto+N+Sg+Ill:  miiton
    mitto+N+Sg+Loc:  mittoost
    mitto+N+Sg+Com:  mittoin
    mitto+N+Sg+Abe:  mitottáá
    mitto+N+Ess:  mitton
    mitto+N+Par:  mittod
    mitto+N+Pl+Nom:  mitoh
    mitto+N+Pl+Gen:  mitoi
    mitto+N+Pl+Acc:  mittoid
    mitto+N+Pl+Ill:  mittoid
    mitto+N+Pl+Loc:  mitoin
    mitto+N+Pl+Com:  mitoiguin
    mitto+N+Pl+Abe:  mitoittáá

  Noun - nijtto:
    nijtto+N+Sg+Nom:  nijtto
    nijtto+N+Sg+Gen:  nijto
    nijtto+N+Sg+Acc:  nijto
    nijtto+N+Sg+Ill:  niijton
    nijtto+N+Sg+Loc: [niijtost, nijttoost]
    nijtto+N+Sg+Com:  nijttoin
    nijtto+N+Sg+Abe:  nijtottáá
    nijtto+N+Ess:  nijtton
    nijtto+N+Ess:  nijttod
    nijtto+N+Pl+Nom:  nijtoh
    nijtto+N+Pl+Gen: [niijtoi, nijtoi]
    nijtto+N+Pl+Acc:  niijtoid
    nijtto+N+Pl+Ill:  nijttoid
    nijtto+N+Pl+Loc:  niijtoin
    nijtto+N+Pl+Com:  nijtoiguin
    nijtto+N+Pl+Abe:  nijtoittáá

  Noun - sijvo:
    sijvo+N+Sg+Nom:  sijvo
    sijvo+N+Sg+Gen: [sijvo, siijvo]
    sijvo+N+Sg+Acc: [sijvo, siijvo]
    sijvo+N+Sg+Ill:  siijvon
    sijvo+N+Sg+Loc: [siijvost, sijvoost]
    sijvo+N+Sg+Com:  sijvoin
    sijvo+N+Sg+Abe:  sijvottáá
    sijvo+N+Ess:  sijvon
    sijvo+N+Par:  sijvod
    sijvo+N+Pl+Nom: [siijvoh, sijvoh]
    sijvo+N+Pl+Gen: [siijvoi, sijvoi]
    sijvo+N+Pl+Acc:  siijvoid
    sijvo+N+Pl+Ill:  sijvoid
    sijvo+N+Pl+Loc:  siijvoin
    sijvo+N+Pl+Com:  sijvoiguin
    sijvo+N+Pl+Abe:  sijvoittáá

  Noun - tipšo:
    tipšo+N+Sg+Nom:  tipšo
    tipšo+N+Sg+Gen:  tipšo
    tipšo+N+Sg+Acc:  tipšo
    tipšo+N+Sg+Ill:  tiipšon
    tipšo+N+Sg+Loc:  tipšoost
    tipšo+N+Sg+Com:  tipšoin
    tipšo+N+Sg+Abe:  tipšottáá
    tipšo+N+Ess:  tipšon
    tipšo+N+Pl+Nom:  tipšoh
    tipšo+N+Pl+Gen:  tipšoi
    tipšo+N+Pl+Acc:  tipšoid
    tipšo+N+Pl+Ill:  tipšoid
    tipšo+N+Pl+Loc:  tipšoin
    tipšo+N+Pl+Com:  tipšoiguin
    tipšo+N+Pl+Abe:  tipšoittáá

  Noun - huilo:
    huilo+N+Sg+Nom:  huilo
    huilo+N+Sg+Gen:  huilo
    huilo+N+Sg+Acc:  huilo
    huilo+N+Sg+Ill:  huuilon
    huilo+N+Sg+Loc:  huiloost
    huilo+N+Sg+Com:  huiloin
    huilo+N+Sg+Abe:  huilottáá
    huilo+N+Ess:  huilon
    huilo+N+Par:  huilod
    huilo+N+Pl+Nom:  huiloh
    huilo+N+Pl+Gen:  huiloi
    huilo+N+Pl+Acc:  huiloid
    huilo+N+Pl+Ill:  huiloid
    huilo+N+Pl+Loc:  huiloin
    huilo+N+Pl+Com:  huiloiguin
    huilo+N+Pl+Abe:  huiloittáá

  Noun - tobdo:
    tobdo+N+Sg+Nom:  tobdo
    tobdo+N+Sg+Gen:  tobdo
    tobdo+N+Sg+Acc:  tobdo
    tobdo+N+Sg+Ill:  toobdon
    tobdo+N+Sg+Loc:  tobdoost
    tobdo+N+Sg+Com:  tobdoin
    tobdo+N+Sg+Abe:  tobdottáá
    tobdo+N+Ess:  tobdon
    tobdo+N+Par:  tobdod
    tobdo+N+Pl+Nom:  tobdoh
    tobdo+N+Pl+Gen:  tobdoi
    tobdo+N+Pl+Acc:  tobdoid
    tobdo+N+Pl+Ill:  tobdoid
    tobdo+N+Pl+Loc:  tobdoin
    tobdo+N+Pl+Com:  tobdoiguin
    tobdo+N+Pl+Abe:  tobdoittáá

  Noun - oljo:
    oljo+N+Sg+Nom:  oljo
    oljo+N+Sg+Gen:  oljo
    oljo+N+Sg+Acc:  oljo
    oljo+N+Sg+Ill:  ooljon
    oljo+N+Sg+Loc:  oljoost
    oljo+N+Sg+Com:  oljoin
    oljo+N+Sg+Abe:  oljottáá
    oljo+N+Ess:  oljon
    oljo+N+Par:  oljod
    oljo+N+Pl+Nom:  oljoh
    oljo+N+Pl+Gen:  oljoi
    oljo+N+Pl+Acc:  oljoid
    oljo+N+Pl+Ill:  oljoid
    oljo+N+Pl+Loc:  oljoin
    oljo+N+Pl+Com:  oljoiguin
    oljo+N+Pl+Abe:  oljoittáá

  Noun - okko:
    okko+N+Sg+Nom:  okko
    okko+N+Sg+Gen:  oho
    okko+N+Sg+Acc:  oho
    okko+N+Sg+Ill:  ookon
    okko+N+Sg+Loc:  ohhoost
    okko+N+Sg+Com:  ohhoin
    okko+N+Sg+Abe:  ohottáá
    okko+N+Ess:  okkon
    okko+N+Par:  okkod
    okko+N+Pl+Nom:  ohoh
    okko+N+Pl+Gen:  ohoi
    okko+N+Pl+Acc:  ohoid
    okko+N+Pl+Ill:  ohhoid
    okko+N+Pl+Loc:  ohoin
    okko+N+Pl+Com:  ohoiguin
    okko+N+Pl+Abe:  ohoittáá

  Noun - osko:
    osko+N+Sg+Nom:  osko
    osko+N+Sg+Gen:  osko
    osko+N+Sg+Acc:  osko
    osko+N+Sg+Ill:  ooskon
    osko+N+Sg+Loc:  oskoost
    osko+N+Sg+Com:  oskoin
    osko+N+Sg+Abe:  oskottáá
    osko+N+Ess:  oskon
    osko+N+Par:  oskod
    osko+N+Pl+Nom:  oskoh
    osko+N+Pl+Gen:  oskoi
    osko+N+Pl+Acc:  oskoid
    osko+N+Pl+Ill:  oskoid
    osko+N+Pl+Loc:  oskoin
    osko+N+Pl+Com:  oskoiguin
    osko+N+Pl+Abe:  oskoittáá

  Noun - koško:
    koško+N+Sg+Nom:  koško
    koško+N+Sg+Gen:  koško
    koško+N+Sg+Acc:  koško
    koško+N+Sg+Ill:  kooškon
    koško+N+Sg+Loc:  koškoost
    koško+N+Sg+Com:  koškoin
    koško+N+Sg+Abe:  koškottáá
    koško+N+Ess:  koškon
    koško+N+Par:  koškod
    koško+N+Pl+Nom:  koškoh
    koško+N+Pl+Gen:  koškoi
    koško+N+Pl+Acc:  koškoid
    koško+N+Pl+Ill:  koškoid
    koško+N+Pl+Loc:  koškoin
    koško+N+Pl+Com:  koškoiguin
    koško+N+Pl+Abe:  koškoittáá
